Louisiana, session 2026, HB169.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.4.2(A)(2)(k) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§574.4.2. Decisions of committee on parole; nature, order, and conditions of parole;
rules of conduct; infectious disease testing
A.
* * *
(2) The committee may also require, either at the time of his release on
parole or at any time while he remains on parole, that he conform to any of the
following conditions of parole which are deemed appropriate to the circumstances
of the particular case:
* * *
(k) Waive extradition to the state of Louisiana from any jurisdiction in or
outside of the United States and agree not to contest any effort by any jurisdiction
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 169 ENROLLED
for return to the state of Louisiana. If returned from a jurisdiction outside the state
of Louisiana, pay the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, division of
probation and parole, for the full cost of extradition based upon the parolee's ability
to pay as determined by the committee on parole.
* * *
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 895(A)(introductory paragraph) and
895.1(B)(introductory paragraph) are hereby amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal
Procedure Articles 895(A)(14) and 895.1(B)(8) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 895. Conditions of probation
A. When the court places a defendant on probation, it shall require the
defendant to refrain from criminal conduct and to pay a supervision fee to defray the
costs of probation supervision, and it. The court may also impose any specific
conditions reasonably related to his rehabilitation, including that the defendant do
any of the following. That the defendant shall that are deemed appropriate to the
circumstances of the particular case:
* * *
(14) Waive extradition to the state of Louisiana from any jurisdiction in or
outside of the United States and agree not to contest any effort by any jurisdiction
for the return to the state of Louisiana.
* * *
Art. 895.1. Probation; restitution; judgment for restitution; fees
* * *
B. When a court suspends the imposition or the execution of a sentence and
places the defendant on probation, it may in its discretion, order placed, as a
condition of probation, order the defendant to pay an amount of money to be paid by
the defendant to toward any or all of the following:
* * *
(8) To the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, division of
probation and parole, for the full cost of extradition in cases where extradition of the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 169 ENROLLED
defendant is warranted. The court may establish a payment plan based upon the
defendant's ability to pay.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.